District of Columbia statutes.
5-111.02

Display of United States flag or colors.

(a)

The uniform of officers and members of the United States Park Police force, the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division, the Capitol Police, and the Metropolitan Police force of the District of Columbia shall bear a distinctive patch, pin, or other emblem depicting the flag of the United States or the colors thereof.

(b)

The Secretary of the Interior in the case in the United States Park Police force, the Secretary of the Treasury in the case of the United States Secret Service Uniformed Division, the Capitol Police Board in the case of the Capitol Police, and the Mayor of the District of Columbia in the case of the Metropolitan Police force shall prescribe such regulations as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

(c)

This section shall take effect 180 days after June 30, 1970.

June 30, 1970, 84 Stat. 357, Pub. L. 91-297, title II, § 201
Nov. 15, 1977, 91 Stat. 1371, Pub. L. 95-179
1981 Ed., § 4-127.
1973 Ed., § 4-130a.
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to the District of Columbia Council and to a Commissioner of the District of Columbia. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.